Massachusetts, session 194th, H4158.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, there shall be in
the town of Weston a select board consisting of five members. The select board shall serve as the
chief executive officer and policy-making body of the town and have and exercise all the powers
and duties vested in boards of selectmen pursuant to the General Laws. Select board members
shall serve for 3-year terms with as nearly as possible one-third of the members’ terms expiring
each year.
SECTION 2. This act will be submitted to the voters of the town of Weston at a special
election occurring not less than 35 days after the effective date of this act in the form of the
following question:
“Shall an act passed by the General Court entitled ‘An Act expanding the select board of
the town of Weston’ be accepted?”
of 2

Below the question shall appear a summary of the act prepared by town counsel and
approved by the select board. If a majority of the votes cast to the question is in the affirmative,
sections 1 and 3 of this act shall take effect in the town of Weston, but not otherwise.
SECTION 3. If the ballot question authorized by Section 2 of this act shall be approved
by the voters, two new offices of select board member shall be included on the ballot at the 2026
annual town election, one for a 3-year term and one for a 2-year term. The new offices shall
appear on the ballot along with the 3-year term expiring in 2026 with instructions to voters to
“vote for 3” and such other information as will aid the voters. The two candidates receiving the
highest number of votes at the election shall serve for terms of three years, and the candidate
receiving the next highest number of votes shall serve a term of two years.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2